Hawaii statutes.
§507-2 Enforcement by sale of animals.
If the owner of the animals, after demand and notice in writing that the lien
will be enforced has been served upon the owner, fails to pay the amount due
for the pasturing, feeding, or sheltering within thirty days, the holder of the
lien may cause the animals to be sold at public auction, upon notice of sale
being given for fifteen days by publication in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county where the animals are pastured, fed, or sheltered. [L
1892, c 9, §2; RL 1925, §2902; RL 1935, §4352; RL 1945, §8752; am L 1955, c 53,
§2; RL 1955, §193-2; HRS §507-2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next